District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.211

Scope of practice for steam and other operating engineers.

(a)

For the purposes of this part, the term “steam engineer” means a person who maintains, inspects and operates steam or hot water boilers, boiler room auxiliary equipment such as pumps, condensate and derating water tanks, blowdown tanks, burners, fuel systems, steam and gas turbines, steam pumps, air compressors, hot water heaters, boiler room electrical systems, chiller room or refrigeration equipment such as centrifugal chillers, reciprocating absorption chillers, air conditioning and refrigeration auxiliaries such as cooling towers, pumps and controls, electrical generators, appliances using gas, liquid fuel, solid fuel or waste heat.

(b)

The term “operating engineer” means a person who operates and maintains cranes, backhoes, bulldozers, air compressors, concrete pumps, derricks, clams or any construction heavy equipment used for hoisting, demolition, digging or earth moving.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.211.